Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2419
Creation of agencies; authorized.

Any combination of two or more municipalities of this state is hereby granted power and authority to create one or more agencies to exercise the powers and authority prescribed by sections 18-2401 to 18-2485.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 19.